Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.240

Terms of members of commodity boards—Elections or appointment.

The term of office of board members shall be three years, and one-third as nearly as may be shall be elected or appointed every year: PROVIDED, That at the inception of any agreement or order the entire board shall be elected or appointed one-third for a term of one year, one-third for a term of two years and one-third for a term of three years to the end that memberships on such board shall be on a rotating basis. In the event an order or agreement provides that both producers and handlers shall be members of such board the terms of each type of member shall be so arranged that one-third of the handler members as nearly as may be and one-third of the producer members as nearly as may be shall be elected or appointed each year.

Any marketing agreement or order may provide for election or appointment of board members by districts, in which case district lines and the number of board members to be elected or appointed from each district shall be specified in such agreement or order and upon such basis as the director finds to be fair and equitable and reasonably adapted to effectuate the declared policies of this chapter.

[ 2002 c 313 s 23; 1961 c 256 s 24.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.